Massachusetts, session 194th, H1992.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 104(e) of Chapter 253 of the Acts of 2020 is hereby amended by
striking the following language “(vi) a requirement preventing an officer from accessing or
viewing any recording of an incident involving the officer before the officer is required to make
a statement about the incident;” and inserting in place thereof the following:-
“(vi) a requirement allowing an officer to access or view any recording of an incident
involving the officer before the officer is required to make a statement about the incident;”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1